Massachusetts, session 194th, H1630.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 276 of the General Law, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 104. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
“Auditing entity”, a person, or an employee or department of the commonwealth, who is 
experienced and trained in evidence collection, storage and auditing, who is deemed qualified by 
the secretary to perform audits of a department’s evidence, property, and evidence and property 
room. 

of 9 9  “Chief executive officer”, the chief executive officer or person in charge of each 
department. 
“Department”, the Massachusetts state police, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation 
Authority police force, any police department in the commonwealth or any of its political 
subdivisions; any law enforcement council, as defined in section 4J of chapter 40, created by 
contract between or among cities and towns, pursuant to section 4A of said chapter 40; the 
environmental police appointed pursuant to chapter 21A; and any entity employing 1 or more 
special state police officers appointed pursuant to section 63 of chapter 22C. 
“District attorney”, the district attorney or designee who has jurisdiction for prosecutions 
where a department is located. 
“Evidence”, all items seized as a result of a police investigation that are physical, 
biological, digital or any other materials that have been collected for their potential evidentiary 
value during the investigation of a crime. 
“Evidence and property custodian”, a person appointed by the chief executive officer or 
designee for the custody and operations of the department’s evidence and property room. 
“Evidence and property room”, any area, including but not limited to, any room, vault, 
locker, or other repository, located within the legal control and jurisdiction of a department that 
contains any evidence or any property. 
“Full audit”, a full review of all items of evidence and property from the particular 
evidence and property room log book, whether in electronic format or hard copy, to ensure that 
all evidence or property is located in the appropriate storage location in the particular evidence 

of 9 30 and property room of each department. If evidence or property is stored off-site, the individual 
conducting the full audit shall contact the particular off-site location and ensure, in writing, that 
any item of evidence or property is at that particular location. 
“Inspection”, a review of the evidence and property room and evidence and property 
handling procedures including, but not limited to: (1) ensuring department adherence to all 
security controls and evidence handling procedures; (2) verifying that the limited access control 
system to the evidence and property room functions properly; (3) ensuring the existence and 
accuracy of a list of department personnel authorized to access the evidence and property room 
or handle evidence or property; (4) ensuring general cleanliness of the evidence and property 
room; (5) ensuring manageable inventory levels within the evidence and property room; (6) 
ensuring evidence and property custodians have acceptable levels of aptitude and training; (7) 
inspecting all internal evidence and property room cameras, when applicable; and (8) ensuring 
the evidence and property room logs are operational and current. 
“Municipal executive officer”, the manager in a city or town with a manager form of 
government; in other cities, the mayor; and in other towns, the board of selectmen. 
“Property”, all items, other than evidence, in the custody of a department that are being 
stored because they were: (i) lost; (ii) abandoned; (iii) taken from a person under arrest by an 
employee of the department in their normal course of employment; or (iv) seized by the 
department for their connection to a potential crime. 
"Purge”, the disposal, destruction or release of evidence or property at a singular time by 
a department. 

of 9 51  "Random-sampling audit", a review and analysis of randomly selected items of evidence 
or property from the particular evidence and property room log book, whether in electronic 
format or hard copy, to ensure that the selected evidence or property is located in the appropriate 
storage location in the particular evidence and property room of each department. If evidence or 
property is stored off-site, the individual conducting the random-sampling audit shall contact the 
particular off-site location and ensure, in writing, that any randomly selected item of evidence or 
property is at that particular location. A random-sampling audit shall review the lesser of 10 
percent of the department’s total number of items of evidence or property or 50 items of 
evidence or property, provided, however, that any department with fewer than 100 items of 
evidence or property shall review at least 10 items and any department with fewer than 10 items 
of evidence or property shall review all items. 
"Secretary”, secretary of the executive office of public safety and security. 
(b) A random-sampling audit shall be conducted no less than annually at the direction of 
the chief executive officer. 
The random-sampling audit shall be conducted by a department employee, provided that, 
the employee shall:  
(1) not be the evidence and property custodian; 
(2) not have specific oversight or responsibilities for the evidence or property being 
audited or the evidence and property room in which the items are stored; and 
(3) not have conducted the required semi-annual inspections in paragraph (c). 

of 9 71  If a department has an internal affairs division, a member of the internal affairs division 
shall perform the random-sampling audit. 
A written report of the random-sampling audit shall be submitted to the chief executive 
officer and the municipal executive officer within 30 days of completion. 
(c) A semi-annual inspection of the evidence and property room shall be conducted by 
the designated supervisor or the unit commander of the evidence and property room. 
A written report of an inspection shall be submitted to the chief executive officer and the 
municipal executive officer within 30 days of completion. 
(d) All written reports required by subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be 
submitted to the secretary not later than January 30 of each year. 
A department which fails to submit all reports to the secretary on or before January 30 of 
each year, shall be issued a written warning by the secretary, provided, however that the 
department shall be allowed an additional 60 days to submit the reports. 
After 60 days, if the department fails to file the reports or refuses to comply, the 
department shall undergo a full audit of all the evidence and property stored and in the 
possession of the department as well as all evidence and property rooms under the legal control 
and jurisdiction of the department. The full audit shall be completed by a neutral auditing entity 
not affiliated with the department chosen by the chief executive officer from a list of qualified 
auditing entities provided by the secretary. The cost of the full audit shall be borne by the 
department. The chief executive officer and department shall have 30 days from the secretary’s 
notice to select an auditing entity from the list provided. 

of 9 92  A written report of the full audit shall be submitted to the secretary, the chief executive 
officer and the municipal executive officer within 30 days of completion. 
(e) Once every 5 years a full audit of the evidence and property held by a department 
shall be completed by an employee of the department at the direction of the chief executive 
officer; provided, however the employee shall: 
(1) not be the evidence and property custodian; and 
(2) not have specific oversight or responsibilities for the evidence or property being 
audited or the evidence and property room in which these items are being stored. 
100  A written report of the full audit shall be submitted to the secretary, the chief executive 
101 officer and the municipal executive officer within 30 days of completion. 
102  If a department fails to conduct the required full audit or submit the full audit report in 
103 accordance with this subsection, the department shall undergo a full audit of all the evidence and 
104 property stored and in the possession of the department as well as all evidence and property 
105 rooms under the legal control and jurisdiction of the department. The full audit shall be 
106 completed by a neutral auditing entity not affiliated with the department chosen by the chief 
107 executive officer from a list of qualified auditing entities provided by the secretary. The cost of 
108 the full audit shall be borne by the department. The chief executive officer and department shall 
109 have 30 days from the secretary’s notice to select an auditing entity from the list provided. 
110  A written report of the full audit shall be submitted to the secretary, the chief executive 
111 officer and the municipal executive officer within 30 days of completion. 

of 9 112  Upon the transfer, resignation or replacement of the chief executive officer, the chief 
113 executive officer currently in charge shall order a full audit of the evidence and property held by 
114 a department. This full audit shall reset the 5 year timeline of the mandatory full audit and the 5 
115 year timeline shall begin after the completion of the full audit conducted pursuant to this 
116 paragraph. 
117  (f) All moneys seized by a department as evidence or within the course of an 
118 investigation, shall be deposited into an interest bearing account held by the department, except 
119 if the moneys physically hold evidentiary value as determined by the department or the district 
120 attorney. The moneys shall be kept in the account until otherwise instructed by the court. All 
121 moneys deposited shall be recorded, including but not limited to, the time, date, account number, 
122 denomination of the moneys, person depositing the moneys, institution where the account is 
123 held, case number associated with the moneys and origin of the moneys. A written report of all 
124 moneys held by the department shall be submitted annually to the secretary, the chief executive 
125 officer, the municipal executive officer and the district attorney on or before January 30 of each 
126 year. 
127  (g) (1) Any evidence or property that is disposed of, returned, auctioned or no longer in 
128 custody of the department shall be recorded. The records shall be made available to any 
129 governmental entity that needs to view the records for legal, official or other public safety or 
130 health reasons. 
131  A department which completes a purge of the evidence or property under the 
132 department’s control shall keep records, including, but not limited to: time, date, type of 
133 evidence, method of disposal, case number, description, name of employee and reason for 

of 9 134 disposal. Upon completion of a purge, all records shall be delivered to the secretary, the chief 
135 executive officer, the municipal executive officer and the district attorney. 
136  (2) A department may dispose of items held as evidence by destruction, return to owner, 
137 sale at auction or other lawful disposition pursuant to a court order or after certifying to the 
138 district attorney that the disposition is in compliance with section 47A of chapter 94C, section 3 
139 of chapter 276, or chapter 278A. 
140  Records of the disposal of controlled substances pursuant to section 47A of chapter 94C 
141 shall be kept by the department.  All records shall be submitted annually to the chief executive 
142 officer, the secretary, the municipal executive office and the district attorney on or before 
143 January 30.  
144  SECTION 2. The department of environmental protection shall conduct a study and 
145 investigation of the licensing of incinerators in the commonwealth. The study shall investigate at 
146 a minimum: (i) the possibility of mandating the disposal of controlled substances as criteria to 
147 obtaining a license, (ii) methods to improve the disposal of controlled substances through safe 
148 and legal means within the commonwealth to prevent the theft and over stock of controlled 
149 substances, and (iii) potential mandates for departments directed towards frequency and usage of 
150 incinerators for purposes of the disposal of controlled substances. The department shall submit a 
151 report of its findings to the joint committee on environment and natural resources, the joint 
152 committee on consumer protection and professional licensure, the joint committee on the 
153 judiciary, and the joint committee on public safety and homeland security on or before July 1, 
154 2027. 

of 9 155  SECTION 3. A department within the commonwealth, as defined by subsection (a) of 
156 section 104 of chapter 276, shall complete a full audit pursuant to subsection (e) of section 104 
157 of chapter 276 of the General Laws within 1 year of the effective date of this act.